New York, session 2025-2026, A9492.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The closing paragraph of subdivision 3 of section 421 of 2 the social services law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 3 amending the executive law relating to requisite training instruction 4 for police officers for crimes involving sexual assaults, as proposed in 5 legislative bills numbers S. 2295 and A. 5206, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 The office of children and family services shall promulgate regu- 8 lations to establish [standards for the development of a] training 9 [curriculum] requirements for child protective services workers [which 10 teaches appropriate investigatory techniques for reports of sexual abuse 11 and mandates on-going training for child protective services workers] 12 consistent with subdivision five of this section, standards for inter- 13 vention, criteria for case closings, criteria for determining whether or 14 not to initiate a child protective proceeding, and criteria for the 15 formulation of treatment plans and for the delivery of child protective 16 services including specification of the services to be classified as 17 child protective services, which shall also apply to any society for the 18 prevention of cruelty to children which has entered into a currently 19 valid contract with a local department of social services to investigate 20 child abuse or maltreatment reports. The office of children and family 21 services shall promulgate regulations establishing minimum standards and 22 practices for the delivery of child protective services in connection 23 with monitoring and supervising respondents and their families as 24 ordered by a family court pursuant to section ten hundred thirty-nine EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06251-04-6 A. 9492 2 1 and paragraphs (i), (iii), (iv) and (v) of subdivision (a) of section 2 ten hundred fifty-two of the family court act. Such regulations shall 3 also require local child protective services to comply with notification 4 requirements of the family court act in connection with such monitoring 5 and supervisory responsibilities. 6 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 421 of the social services law is 7 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 8 (e) promulgate regulations setting forth training requirements for 9 child protective services workers assigned to a multidisciplinary inves- 10 tigative team established pursuant to subdivision six of section four 11 hundred twenty-three of this title, which shall include appropriate 12 techniques for investigating reports of sexual abuse and requirements 13 for ongoing training. 14 § 3. Section 5 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the executive 15 law relating to requisite training instruction for police officers for 16 crimes involving sexual assaults, as proposed in legislative bills 17 numbers S. 2295 and A. 5206, is amended to read as follows: 18 § 5. This act shall take effect [on the ninetieth day] one year after 19 it shall have become a law. 20 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 21 sections one and two of this act shall take effect on the same date and 22 in the same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the execu- 23 tive law relating to requisite training instruction for police officers 24 for crimes involving sexual assaults, as proposed in legislative bills 25 numbers S. 2295 and A. 5206, takes effect.